Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 6
UNLAWFUL ACTS

44-32-601. Underage wagering.

No person under the age of eighteen years shall purchase, redeem, or attempt to purchase or redeem any pari-mutuel ticket.

No person shall sell any pari-mutuel ticket to a person under the age of eighteen years.

Any person who violates this section commits a civil infraction.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 308, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3331, § 798, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-601 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-602. Simulcast facilities and simulcast races - unlawful act - repeal.

It is unlawful for any person to accept or place wagers on any simulcast race within the state of Colorado except under the provisions of this article 32. It is lawful to conduct pari-mutuel wagering on simulcast races of horses or greyhounds that are received by an in-state simulcast facility authorized and operated pursuant to this article 32.

Cross simulcasting between an in-state host track or an out-of-state host track and an in-state simulcast facility, or between an in-state host track and an out-of-state simulcast facility, is permissible.

A race meet of horses that is conducted at an in-state host track may be received as a simulcast race by any simulcast facility; except that, notwithstanding any consent granted pursuant to section 44-32-102 (11), an in-state simulcast facility that is located within fifty miles of a horse track that has held, within the previous twelve months, or is licensed and scheduled to hold within the next twelve months, a horse race meet of no less than thirty race days, may not receive simulcast races of horses on any day on which the horse track is running live horse races unless the licensee of the horse track consents thereto.

An in-state simulcast facility may, subject to the commission's approval, receive the broadcast signal of greyhounds from an out-of-state host track and conduct pari-mutuel wagering on the signal through an in-state simulcast facility located on the premises of a class B track that has conducted, or is scheduled to conduct during the next twelve months, a live race meet of horses of at least the duration required for a class B track.
(4) (a) (I) An in-state simulcast facility may, subject to the commission's approval, receive the broadcast signal of greyhounds from an out-of-state host track and conduct pari-mutuel wagering on the signal through an in-state simulcast facility located on the premises of a class B track that has conducted, or is scheduled to conduct during the next twelve months, a live race meet of horses of at least the duration required for a class B track.

The specified portions of the gross receipts from pari-mutuel wagers placed at an in-state simulcast facility on simulcast greyhound races being held on out-of-state host tracks from signals received through a class B track shall be distributed in accordance with section 44-32-701 (2).

An in-state simulcast facility that is located on the premises of a class B track may receive simulcast horse races from an out-of-state host track as authorized by the commission. The total includes, and is not in addition to, the days on which live racing is held.
(b) (I) (A) An in-state simulcast facility that is located on the premises of a class B track may receive simulcast horse races from an out-of-state host track as authorized by the commission. The total includes, and is not in addition to, the days on which live racing is held.

A facility that is reopening as a track may receive three days of simulcast horse races from an out-of-state host track for each day of live horse racing for which the commission has granted it a race date for the subsequent year. A day of simulcast horse races, for the purposes of this subsection (4)(b), shall not include a day on which live horse races are conducted at the horse track at which the simulcast facility is located or a day on which the simulcast facility receives only simulcast races of horses from a race meet conducted at an in-state host track.

An in-state simulcast facility that is not located on the premises of a horse track that runs a horse race meet of at least thirty live race days may receive a broadcast signal of a simulcast horse race conducted at an out-of-state host track only through an in-state simulcast facility that is located on the premises of a horse track that runs a horse race meet of at least thirty live race days.

On any day on which an in-state simulcast facility receives simulcast horse races, either directly from an out-of-state host track or through another in-state simulcast facility or facility that is reopening as a track, and on which one or more in-state host tracks are running live horse races, the in-state simulcast facility shall receive and conduct pari-mutuel wagering on the broadcast signal of simulcast horse races from at least one such in-state host track, if the broadcast signal is made available to it on usual and customary terms and conditions, including price, as determined by the commission.

All simulcasting of horse races shall comply with the federal "Interstate Horseracing Act of 1978", 15 U.S.C. secs. 3001-3007, as amended.

For purposes of administering this subsection (4)(b), each operating year of an in-state simulcast facility located on the premises of a class B track shall be deemed to begin on April 21 and end on the following April 20. Simulcast days allotted to such a facility pursuant to this subsection (4)(b) may be used at any time during the operating year, but unused days remaining as of the end of one operating year may not be carried forward to the next operating year.

An in-state simulcast facility having a written simulcast racing agreement with an in-state or out-of-state host track pursuant to section 44-32-503 (2) may receive simulcast races, as specified in subsections (2) to (4) of this section, on any day, including a day not within the race meet of the in-state simulcast facility that is also a track and a day on which no live race is conducted within the race meet of the in-state simulcast facility that is also a track.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 309, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(4)(b)(I)(B) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3481, § 69, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-602 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-603. Duration of meets.

It is unlawful to conduct any race meet at which wagering is permitted except under the provisions of this article 32. It is lawful to conduct pari-mutuel wagering on live horse races that are part of a race meet licensed and conducted under this article 32. The duration of a horse race meet at a class B track is as specified in section 44-32-102 (3); except that the commission may prescribe a lesser number of race days in the event of unforeseen circumstances or acts of God.

A race day is any period of twenty-four hours beginning at 12 midnight Colorado time and included in the period of a race meet and upon which day live racing is held. Dark days within a race meet are not counted as race days. Days on which an in-state simulcast facility that is a track receives simulcast races but does not conduct live races are not counted as race days. Subject to this article 32, the commission shall determine the number and kind of race meets to be held at any one track; however, race meet days are permitted on Sundays.

In order to promote live racing of horses throughout the state of Colorado, the commission, when determining the number and kind of race meets held and the dates and times of races held at race meets, may take into consideration the interests of the racing industry as a whole throughout the state but shall give particular consideration to the racing dates and times requested by or assigned to the following:

In the case of class A tracks, other class A tracks; and

In the case of class B tracks, other class B tracks.

The commission shall determine, consistent with all other provisions of this article 32, the total number of races conducted and performances held during a race meet.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 311, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-603 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-604. Greyhound racing prohibited.

No live greyhound racing involving the betting or wagering on the speed or ability of the greyhounds racing shall be conducted in Colorado. The commission shall not accept or approve an application or request for race dates for live greyhound racing in Colorado.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 311, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-604 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-605. Wagering on historic races - definitions.

The state, a municipality, city and county, county, or any state or local agency, board, commission, or official thereof, shall not approve or permit the use of a racing replay and wagering device.

A licensee shall not operate, offer to operate, or use a racing replay and wagering device or allow any person to use a racing replay and wagering device to place a wager on any previously run sporting event.

This section does not apply to a simulcast race.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Racing replay and wagering device" means a mechanical, electronic, or computerized piece of equipment that:

Can display a previously run sporting event, regardless of how the sporting event is displayed, rebroadcast, or replayed; and

Gives a player who places a wager on the outcome of the previously run sporting event an opportunity to win a thing of value, whether due to the skill of the player, chance, or both.

"Sporting event" means a contest in which animals, people, or machines compete individually or as teams for the purpose of winning a race, game, contest, or other competition.

"Wager" means to place at risk of loss any valuable consideration, including coin, currency, or the electronic equivalent of any coin or currency.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 312, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-605 as it existed prior to 2018.